pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Cheerleading: Kokardy do włosów do cheerleadingu; Megafony do cheerleadingu; Pompony dla cheerleaderek; Buty do cheerleadingu; Pomoce treningowe do cheerleadingu; Stroje do cheerleadingu
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > チアリーディング: チアリーディング用ヘアリボン; チアリーディング用メガホン; チアポンポン; チアリーディング用シューズ; チアリーディング用トレーニング補助具; チアリーディング用ユニフォーム
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Cheerleaden: Haarstrikken voor cheerleading; Megafoons voor cheerleading; Pompons voor cheerleaders; Cheerleadingschoenen; Trainingshulpmiddelen voor cheerleading; Cheerleading-uniformen
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Líder de torcida: Laços de cabelo de líder de torcida; Megafones de líder de torcida; Pompons de líderes de torcida; Tênis de líder de torcida; Acessórios de treinamento para líder de torcida; Uniformes de líder de torcida
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Cheerleading: Cheerleading-Haarschleifen; Cheerleading-Megaphone; Cheerleader-Pompons; Cheerleading-Schuhe; Cheerleading-Trainingshilfen; Cheerleading-Uniformen
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Μαζορέτες: Φιόγκοι μαλλιών cheerleading; Τηλεβόες cheerleading; Πομ-πομ μαζορέτας; Παπούτσια cheerleading; Βοηθήματα προπόνησης cheerleading; Στολές cheerleading
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Чирлидинг: Банты для черлидинга; Мегафоны для черлидинга; Помпоны для чирлидинга; Обувь для черлидинга; Тренажеры и инвентарь для черлидинга; Униформа для черлидинга
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Navijaško plesanje: Navijaške pentlje za lase; Navijaški megafoni; Navijaški cofi; Navijaški čevlji; Vadbeni pripomočki za navijanje; Navijaške uniforme
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Komandų palaikymo šokiai: Palaikymo komandų plaukų kaspinai; Palaikymo komandų megafonai; Komandų palaikymo šokėjų pomponai; Palaikymo komandų batai; Palaikymo komandos treniruočių priemonės; Palaikymo komandų uniformos
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Мажоретки: Панделки за коса за мажоретки; Мажоретни мегафони; Мажоретни помпони; Обувки за мажоретки; Тренировъчни средства за мажоретки; Униформи за мажоретки
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 치어리딩: 치어리딩 헤어 보우; 치어리딩 확성기; 치어리딩 응원 수술; 치어리딩화; 치어리딩 훈련 보조 기구; 치어리딩 유니폼
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Cheerleading: Cheerleading Hair Bows; Cheerleading Megaphones; Cheerleading Pom Poms; Cheerleading Shoes; Cheerleading Training Aids; Cheerleading Uniforms
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Cheerleading: Hårrosetter för cheerleading; Megafoner för cheerleading; Pom-poms; Cheerleading-skor; Träningsredskap för cheerleading; Cheerleading-dräkter
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Claques: Laços de cabelo de cheerleading; Megafones de cheerleading; Pompons para claques; Calçado de cheerleading; Acessórios de treino de cheerleading; Uniformes de cheerleading
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Majorete: Funde de păr pentru majorete; Megafoane pentru majorete; Pompoane pentru majorete; Încălțăminte pentru majorete; Accesorii de antrenament pentru majorete; Uniforme pentru majorete
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Roztlieskavanie: Mašle do vlasov pre roztlieskavačky; Megafóny pre roztlieskavačky; Pompomy pre roztlieskavačky; Obuv pre roztlieskavačky; Tréningové pomôcky pre roztlieskavačky; Uniformy pre roztlieskavačky
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Cheerleading: Fiocchi per capelli da cheerleading; Megafoni da cheerleading; Pon-pon da cheerleader; Scarpe da cheerleading; Attrezzatura per l'allenamento cheerleading; Divise da cheerleading
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Cheerleading: Hårsløjfer til cheerleading; Megafoner til cheerleading; Pomponer; Cheerleading-sko; Træningsudstyr til cheerleading; Cheerleading-uniformer
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 啦啦隊: 啦啦隊髮結; 啦啦隊擴音器; 啦啦隊彩球; 啦啦隊鞋; 啦啦隊訓練輔助器材; 啦啦隊制服
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Cheerleading: Hårsløyfer for cheerleading; Megafoner for cheerleading; Pom Poms til cheerleading; Cheerleading-sko; Treningsutstyr for cheerleading; Cheerleading-uniformer
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เชียร์ลีดดิ้ง: โบผูกผมเชียร์ลีดเดอร์; โทรโข่งเชียร์ลีดเดอร์; พู่เชียร์; รองเท้าเชียร์ลีดเดอร์; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมเชียร์ลีดเดอร์; ชุดเชียร์ลีดเดอร์
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Navijanje: Mašne za kosu za navijanje; Megafoni za navijanje; Pomponi za navijanje; Cipele za navijanje; Pomagala za trening navijanja; Uniforme za navijanje
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Cheerleading: Nœuds pour cheveux de cheerleading; Mégaphones de cheerleading; Pompons de cheerleading; Chaussures de cheerleading; Matériel d'entraînement de cheerleading; Uniformes de cheerleading
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Szurkolás: Cheerleading hajmasnik; Cheerleading megafonok; Szurkolói pom pomok; Cheerleading cipők; Cheerleading edzéssegítő eszközök; Cheerleading egyenruhák
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Roztleskávání: Mašle do vlasů na cheerleading; Megafony pro cheerleading; Pompony pro roztleskávačky; Boty na cheerleading; Tréninkové pomůcky na cheerleading; Cheerleadingové uniformy
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Animadoras: Lazos para el cabello de porristas; Megáfonos de porristas; Pompones; Zapatillas de porristas; Artículos de entrenamiento para porristas; Uniformes de porristas
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Cheerleading: Cheerleading-hiusrusetit; Cheerleading-megafonit; Cheerleadingin pom-pon-huiskat; Cheerleading-kengät; Cheerleading-harjoitusvälineet; Cheerleading-puvut
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Amigoluk: Amigo saç fiyonkları; Amigo megafonları; Amigo Ponponları; Amigo ayakkabıları; Amigoluk antrenman yardımcıları; Amigo formaları
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Thể dục cổ vũ: Nơ cài tóc nhảy cổ vũ; Loa cổ vũ; Quả cầu bông của hoạt náo viên; Giày nhảy cổ vũ; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập nhảy cổ vũ; Đồng phục nhảy cổ vũ
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 啦啦队用品: 啦啦队蝴蝶结发饰; 啦啦队扩音器; 啦啦队花球; 啦啦队鞋; 啦啦队训练辅助器材; 啦啦队服